Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 2. State or National Criminal History Record Information

§ 7-19-201.
State or national criminal history record information.

The following persons shall be required to submit to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national criminal history record information:

Employees of substitute care providers certified by the department of family services pursuant to W.S.

14-4-101

through

14-4-116

;

State institution, department of family services or department of health employees who may have access to minors, to persons suffering mental illness or developmental disabilities or to the elderly;

Applicants for initial certification by the professional teaching standards board and employees initially hired by a school district on or after July 1, 1996, who may have access to minors in the course of their employment. In accordance with W.S. 21-3-111(a) (xxi), employees of a school district who meet the qualifications of this paragraph shall also be required to submit to fingerprinting for purposes of this subsection upon request of, and payment of applicable fees by, the employing school district;

All persons applying for licensure to the Wyoming Board of Examiners for Optometry on or after July 1, 2005;

Department of health or department of family services contractors providing specialized home care or respite care to minors;

Persons applying for a permit or license under W.S. 11-25-104(f) or if required under W.S. 11-25-104(k);

Prospective employees or volunteers of a public fire department, ambulance service, a county providing fire protection services pursuant to W.S.

18-3-509

or fire protection district if the department, service, county or district requires prospective employees or volunteers or both, to submit to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national criminal history record information as a condition for a position with the department, service, county or district;

Prospective employees of or volunteers with the Wyoming military department or active duty or Wyoming national guard military members if the department requires state and national criminal history record information as a condition for employment with the department, for training, deployment or mobilization decisions or for security clearance matters;

Persons applying for a dealer or Wyoming based manufacturer license under W.S.

31-16-103

or a special sales permit under W.S.

31-16-127

;

Department of audit employees or applicants for employment who have access to confidential financial or accounting records;

Persons applying for a permit under W.S.

33-39-109

or a registration under W.S.

33-39-209

or

33-39-211

;

State auditor employees or applicants for employment who have access to confidential financial or accounting records;

Persons applying for a new license under W.S.

33-28-106

;

Wyoming retirement system employees or applicants for employment who have access to confidential financial information or records;

All persons applying for licensure or certification to the Wyoming board of physical therapy on or after July 1, 2009;

Mortgage lenders, mortgage brokers, mortgage loan originators, money transmitters and persons identified in W.S. 40-23-107(b)(i), as necessary to perform the background checks required by W.S. 40-14-604(a)(vii), 40-14-634(p)(i), 40-14-642(c)(i), 40-22-108(e) and (h)(i), 40-23-103(a)(viii) and 40-23-125(c)(i);

All persons applying for licensure or certification to the Wyoming board of medicine on or after July 1, 2009, whose application or other information received by the board indicates that the applicant has or may have been convicted of a crime, and any licensee of the board of medicine upon written request from the board of medicine as part of an ongoing investigation of or disciplinary action against the licensee;

Employees, prospective employees and volunteers of the Wyoming department of transportation, as necessary to perform the background checks required by W.S. 31-7-103(b) and 31-7-114(f)(iv);

All persons applying for licensure to the Wyoming board of midwifery whose application or other information received by the board indicates that the applicant has or may have been convicted of a crime, and any licensee of the board of midwifery upon written request from the board of midwifery as part of an ongoing investigation of or disciplinary action against the licensee;

Persons applying for an initial license under Wyoming statutes title 26, chapter 9;

Board members, applicants, vendors and retailers required to receive a background investigation as provided in W.S. 9-17-104(c), 9-17-110(e) and 9-17-120(b) and (c)(i). Fingerprint card submissions under this paragraph shall be forwarded through the division of criminal investigation and the division of criminal investigation shall be responsible for receiving and screening the results of any record check to determine an applicant’s suitability for employment or licensing under the provisions specified in this paragraph;

Persons conducting skills testing under W.S. 31-7-114(f)(iv);

Employees of the state, state agencies, institutions and political subdivisions of the state, or applicants for employment with any of those entities, whose job duties require access to federal tax information, if the head of the agency, institution or political subdivision, or their designee, determines that federal law governing access to federal tax information requires a criminal history record check of the employee or applicant. The provisions of this paragraph shall also apply to individuals who are contractors or subcontractors providing goods or services to any of the specified entities, if in the performance of the contract the individual has or will have access to federal tax information and the contracting governmental entity determines that federal law requires the criminal history record check;

Department of enterprise technology services employees or applicants for employment who have access to confidential information or records, if required by the state chief information officer as a condition for a position with the department of enterprise technology services;

Health care professionals applying for licensure under title 33 of the Wyoming statutes, if required as a condition for licensure pursuant to an interstate compact entered into by the state of Wyoming;

If requested by the department of health, persons specified in W.S. 40-28-103(d) as part of a medical digital innovation sandbox application;

Persons specified in W.S. 40-29-104(d) as part of a financial technology sandbox application;

State treasurer’s office employees, interns or applicants for employment who have access to confidential financial, accounting or investment information or records;

Persons applying for licensure on or after July 1, 2020 as speech-language pathologists, audiologists or speech-language pathology assistants under Wyoming statutes title 33, chapter 33;

All persons applying for licensure or certification to the mental health professions licensing board under title 33, chapter 38 of the Wyoming statutes;

All persons applying for licensure to the board of nursing home administrators under title 33, chapter 22 of the Wyoming statutes;

All persons applying for licensure or certification to the board of psychology under title 33, chapter 27 of the Wyoming statutes;

All persons applying for a compact privilege under the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact as provided in W.S.

33-40-201

through

33-40-216

.

Fingerprints taken pursuant to this article shall be submitted to the Wyoming division of criminal investigation for processing and obtaining state and national criminal history record information and shall be accompanied by the fee required by W.S.

7-19-108

. Upon payment of required fees, the division shall process and obtain state and national criminal history record information for the Wyoming state board of nursing and the board of pharmacy or for an applicant for licensure or certification by either board.

Pursuant to federal P.L. 92-544, the division may submit any applicant fingerprint cards received pursuant to this article to the federal bureau of investigation for the purpose of obtaining national criminal history record information.

The department of administration and information shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section.

The Wyoming military department, any public fire department, ambulance service or regional emergency response team may as a condition of employment or other participation with the entity require all applicants for employee or volunteer positions with the entity to submit to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national criminal history record information. In addition, the office of homeland security may as a condition of participation in a regional emergency response team require all team participants to submit to fingerprinting in order to obtain state and national criminal history record information.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 113, § 1; 1993, ch. 153, § 1; 1996, ch. 94, § 2; 1997, ch. 20, § 1; 2003, ch. 176, § 2; ch. 201, § 1; 2005, ch. 59, § 1; ch. 171, § 1; 2006, ch. 26, § 1; ch. 62, § 1; 2007, ch. 21, § 1; ch. 80, § 2; ch. 107, § 1; ch. 184, § 1; 2008, ch. 7, § 1; 2009, ch. 35, § 1; ch. 63, § 1; ch. 72, § 1; ch. 134, § 2; ch. 184, § 2; ch. 201, § 1; 2010, ch. 46, § 2; ch 82, § 1; 2011, ch. 55, § 1; 2012, ch. 71, § 1; 2013 ch. 27, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 71, § 1, effective January 1, 2014; 2013 ch. 180, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 200, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 129, § 1, effective March 3, 2017; 2017 ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 147, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2019 ch. 61, § 3, effective January 1, 2020; 2019 ch. 198, § 2, effective January 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 8, § 1, effective March 5, 2020; 2020 ch. 114, § 2, effective March 17, 2020; 2020 ch. 128, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 109, § 2, effective April 5, 2021; 2022 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 47, § 2, effective March 9, 2022; 2022 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 59, § 1, rewrote (a), moving provisions pertaining to fingerprinting to an introductory sentence, adding paragraph designations, and adding (a)(iv).

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 171, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added (e).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, by Laws 2006, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2006, added (a)(vi).

The second 2006 amendment, by Laws 2006, ch. 62, § 1, added (a)(vi) which is now redesignated as (a)(vii); in (e), deleted “or private” following “Any public,” and added the last sentence.

Laws 2006, ch. 62, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

Neither amendment gave effect to the other and this section is set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(viii); in (e) substituted “The Wyoming military department, any” for “Any.”

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 80, § 2, effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(ix).

The third 2007 amendment, by ch. 107, § 1, added (a)(viii).

Laws 2007, ch. 107, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

The fourth 2007 amendment, by ch. 184, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, added subsection (a)(xi).

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, this section is set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (a)(xii).

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by ch. 35, § 1, effective January 1, 2010, added (a)(xviii).

The second 2009 amendment, by ch. 63, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(xiv).

The third 2009 amendment, by ch. 72, § 1, added (a)(xv).

Laws 2009, ch. 72, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2009.

The fourth 2009 amendment, by ch. 134, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(xvi).

The fifth 2009 amendment, by ch. 184, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(xvii)

The sixth 2009 amendment, by ch. 201, § 1, added (a)(xviii).

Laws 2009, ch. 201, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2009.

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, by ch. 46, § 2, added (a)(xix).

Laws 2010, ch. 46, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.

The second 2010 amendment, by ch. 82, § 1, in (a)(xvi), substituted “40-23-107(b)(i)” for “40-23-107(a)(iii).”

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (a)(xx).

The 2012 amendment,

added the last sentence of (a)(iii).

Laws 2012, ch. 71 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2012.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 27, §
1, effective July 1, 2013, in (a)(xvi), inserted “money transmitters,” and inserted internal references.

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 71, §
1, effective January 1, 2014, added “and 31-7-114(f)(iv)” in (a)(xviii); and added (xxi).

The third 2013 amendment, by ch. 180, § 2, effective July 1, 2013, added “or a registration under W.S.

33-39-209

or

33-39-211

” in (a)(xi).

The fourth 2013 amendment, by ch. 200, § 2, effective January 1, 2013, added (a)(xxi).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Legislative Service Office.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 129, § 1, adds (a)(xxiii).

Laws 2017, ch. 129, § 2, makes the amendment effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art.
4, § 8, Wy. Const. Approved Mar. 6, 2017.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 131, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, added (a)(xxiii).

The third
2017 amendment, by ch. 147, § 1, added (a)(xxiii).

Laws 2017, ch. 147, § 2, makes the amendment effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art.
4, § 8, Wy. Const. Approved Mar. 6, 2017.

While none
of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been set out
as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment by ch. 61, § 3, effective January 1, 2020, added (a)(xxvii).

The second 2019 amendment by ch. 198, § 2, effective January 1, 2020, added (a)(xxvi).

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 8, § 1, added (a)(xxviii).

Laws 2020, ch. 8, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2020.

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 114, § 2, in (a)(vi) added “or if otherwise required under title 11, chapter 25 of the Wyoming statutes” at the end.

Laws 2020, ch. 114, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved March 17, 2020.

The third 2020 amendment, by ch. 128, § 2, effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(xxix).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(xxx).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 109, § 2, substituted “or if required under W.S. 11-25-104(k)” for “or if otherwise required under title 11, chapter 25 of the Wyoming statutes” in (a)(vi).

Laws 2021, ch. 109, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, added (a)(xxxi).

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 47, § 2, added (a)(xxxii).

Laws 2022, ch. 47, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

The third 2022 amendment, by ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2022, added (a)(xxxiii).

The fourth 2022 amendment, by ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, in (a)(viii), added “or active duty or Wyoming national guard military members,” deleted “prospective employees or volunteers, or both, to submit to fingerprinting in order to obtain” following “department requires,” substituted “employment” for “a position,” and added “, for training, deployment or mobilization decisions or for security clearance matters.”

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.